Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.060

Governing administrative law and procedure.

The powers and duties of the director and required practices and procedures of the department with respect to all enforcement authority conferred by this title shall be subject to the Washington administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, consistent with the administrative procedures applicable to this chapter.

[ 2019 c 389 s 18; 2014 c 37 s 339.]